src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
tanka+N:tanka PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tanker+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘anker REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tankett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tank˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tankiin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tank˘iin TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tankimisjaam+N:t˘ankimis%#j˘aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tankist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tank˘ist TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
tankitõrje+N:tanki%#t˘õrje PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tankitõrjepüss+N:tanki%#t˘õrje%#p˘üsʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tankla+N:t˘ankla AASTA  "weight: 8 " ; 
tanksaabas+N:t˘ank%#s˘aaP2a KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tankur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ankur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
tanner+N:tanD1E2r MANNER  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tanniin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tann˘iin TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
tanta+N:tanta PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tante+N:tante PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantra+N:t˘antra AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantsija+N:t˘anʲtsija AASTA  "weight: 8 " ; 
tantsijanna+N:t˘anʲtsijanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsijatar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘anʲtsijatar TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsisklus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tanʲtsisklus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tanʲtsitus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantstõbi+N:t˘ants%#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsuetendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tantsu%#etendus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
tantsumees+N:tantsu%#me MEES  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantsumuusika+N:tantsu%#muusika AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
tantsunumber+N:tantsu%#n˘umber%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantsupidu+N:tantsu%#piD1u KAVA  "weight: 9 " ; 
tantsupoiss+N:tantsu%#p˘oiss POISS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantsupõrand+N:tantsu%#põrand MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
tantsusaal+N:tantsu%#s˘aalʲ TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
tantsusamm+N:tantsu%#s˘amm%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
tantsustiil+N:tantsu%#st˘iil TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantsutrall+N:tantsu%#tr˘alʲl TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantsutrupp+N:tantsu%#tr˘upp TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
tantsuõhtu+N:tantsu%#˘õhtu AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
tantsuõpetaja+N:tantsu%#õpetaja AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
tanu+N:tanu KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
tanulane+N:tanulane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tanum+N:tanum MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
taoism+N:tao˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taolisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aolisus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
taosed+N:t˘aos SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
taotleja+N:t˘aotleja AASTA  "weight: 8 " ; 
taotlemine+N:t˘aotlemine OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taotlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aotlus SUULINE  "weight: 6 " ; 
tapalane+N:tapalane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tapalanna+N:tapalanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tapamaja+N:tapa%#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 9 " ; 
tapariist+N:tapa%#r˘iist%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
tapatalgud+N:tapa%#t˘algu AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
tapatöö+N:tapa%#t˘öö%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 10 " ; 
tape+N:t˘apP1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tapeet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tap˘eetʲ TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
tapetu+N:tapetu AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tapiir+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tap˘iir TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tapiokk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tapi˘okk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tapivangla+N:tapi%#v˘angla AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tapja+N:t˘apja AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taplus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aplus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tapmine+N:t˘apmine OLULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
tapmiskatse+N:t˘apmis%#k˘atse PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tapmiskoht+N:t˘apmis%#k˘ohT1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tapp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘app TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tapp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘app%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tapp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘app%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tapper+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘apper%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
tara+N:tara KAVA  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taraan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tar˘aan TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarakan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarakan TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarand REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
tarandik+N:tˈarand˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarang+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarang VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarantass+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tˈarant˘ass TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarantel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tar˘antel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarantella+N:tarantˈella PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarastus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbeese+N:t˘arbe%#ese HAARE  "weight: 10 " ; 
tarbekunst+N:t˘arbe%#k˘unʲst TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbekunstnik+N:t˘arbe%#k˘unʲstn˘ik ÄMBLIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarbetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘arbetus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbija+N:t˘arbija AASTA  "weight: 7 " ; 
tarbijahind+N:t˘arbija%#h˘inD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
tarbijakaitse+N:t˘arbija%#k˘aitse PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
tarbijakaitseamet+N:t˘arbija%#k˘aitse%#amet REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
tarbijakaitseliit+N:t˘arbija%#k˘aitse%#l˘iit%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarbijakaitseseadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘arbija%#k˘aitse%#s˘eadus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbijakaitsja+N:t˘arbija%#k˘aitsja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbijaskond+N:t˘arbijask˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbijaskooperatiiv+N:t˘arbijas%#kooperat˘iiv TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbijaühiskond+N:t˘arbija%#ˈühisk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarbimine+N:t˘arbimine OLULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
tarbimistase+N:t˘arbimis%#tase HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarbimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘arbimus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tardaine+N:t˘ard%#˘aine PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tardkivim+N:t˘ard%#kivim REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tardumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ardumus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarduvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘arduvus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
tare+N:tare%{stemill%} PERE  "weight: 9 " ; 
targutaja+N:targutaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
targutamine+N:targutamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
targutlemine+N:targutlemine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@targutlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@targutlus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@targutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@targutus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@tari+N:@P.Stem.Single@t˘arJ1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarifikatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarifikatsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tariif+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tar˘iif TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarind+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarind REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarindus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarindus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
taristu+N:taristu AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tark+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ark%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 6 " ; 
tarkpea+N:t˘ark%#p˘E6A6%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘arkus SUULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
tarkuseiva+N:t˘arkuse%#iva KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarkusesõna+N:t˘arkuse%#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarkussõna+N:t˘arkus%#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarkvara+N:t˘ark%#vara KAVA  "weight: 6 " ; 
tarm+N:t˘arm%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarmukus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarmukus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarn+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘arn%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarne+N:t˘arne PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
tarneleping+N:t˘arne%#leping VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarnija+N:t˘arnija AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
tarnimine+N:t˘arnimine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
taro+N:taro PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarokk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tar˘okk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarre+N:t˘arD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarrend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarrend REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarretis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarretis OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarretus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tarretus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tartaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tart˘aan TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tartar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tartar REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
tartlane+N:t˘artlane SUULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
tartlanna+N:t˘artlanna PERE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tartlett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tartl˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
tartumaalane+N:t˘artu%#m˘aalane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tartüff+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tart˘üff TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
taru+N:taru%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
tarupigi+N:taru%#pigi KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
